hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Asztali shuffleboard: Shuffleboard-asztalok; Asztali shuffleboard huzatok; Asztali shuffleboard-por; Asztali shuffleboard-korongok
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Jakkolo: Shuffleboard-Tische; Abdeckungen für Table Shuffleboard; Jakkolo-Pulver; Jakkolo-Spielsteine
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Stolní shuffleboard: Stoly na shuffleboard; Obaly na stolní shuffleboard; Prášek na stolní shuffleboard; Puky na stolní shuffleboard
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 테이블 셔플보드: 셔플보드 테이블; 테이블 셔플보드 커버; 테이블 셔플보드 파우더; 테이블 셔플보드 퍽
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Namizni shuffleboard: Shuffleboard mize; Pokrivala za namizni shuffleboard; Puder za namizni shuffleboard; Ploščki za namizni shuffleboard
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Shuffleboard til bord: Borde til shuffleboard; Betræk til shuffleboardborde; Glidepulver til shuffleboard; Pucker to shuffleboard
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Tafelshuffleboard: Shuffleboardtafels; Hoezen voor shuffleboard-tafels; Tafelshuffleboardpoeder; Pucks voor tafelshuffleboard
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Шафълборд на маса: Маси за шафълборд; Покривала за шафълборд маси; Пудра за шафълборд на маса; Шайби за шафълборд на маса
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Tejos de mesa: Mesa de tejo; Fundas para mesas de shuffleboard; Polvo para tejos de mesa; Discos para tejo de mesa
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > ชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด: โต๊ะชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; ผ้าคลุมโต๊ะชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; แป้งสำหรับเกมชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; ลูกชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Tavolo da shuffleboard: Tavoli da shuffleboard; Coperture per tavolo da shuffleboard; Polvere tavolo da shuffleboard; Buche tavolo da shuffleboard
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Shuffleboard: Shuffleboard-pöydät; Pöytäshuffleboardin suojukset; Shuffleboard-jauhe; Shuffleboard-kiekot
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Table Shuffleboard: Shuffleboard Masaları; Shuffleboard masası örtüleri; Table Shuffleboard Pudraları; Table Shuffleboard Diskleri
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Shuffleboard de table: Tables de shuffleboard; Housses pour tables de shuffleboard; Poudre pour shuffleboard de table; Palets pour shuffleboard de table
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 沙弧球: 沙狐球桌; 桌上沙狐球桌罩; 沙狐球粉; 沙狐球用球
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Stalo slydinys: Slydinio stalai; Stalo šaflbordų dangčiai; Stalo slydinio milteliai; Stalo slydinio rituliai
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Shuffleboard stołowy: Stoły do gry w shuffleboard; Pokrowce na shuffleboard stołowy; Proszki do gry w shuffleboard stołowy; Krążki do gry w shuffleboard stołowy
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Настольный шаффлборд: Столы для шаффлборда; Чехлы для настольного шаффлборда; Воск для столов для шаффлборда; Шайбы для настольного шаффлборда
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Mesa de shuffleboard: Mesas para shuffleboard; Capas para shuffleboard de mesa; Cera para mesa de shuffleboard; Discos para mesa de shuffleboard
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Shuffleboard de masă: Mese de shuffleboard; Huse pentru mese de shuffleboard; Talc pentru mese de shuffleboard; Pucuri pentru mese de shuffleboard
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Stolný shuffleboard: Stoly na shuffleboard; Poťahy na stolný shuffleboard; Púder na stolný shuffleboard; Puky na stolný shuffleboard
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 沙狐球: 沙狐球桌/沙狐球台; 桌上沙狐球桌罩; 沙狐球沙; 沙壶球
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Shuffleboard: Shuffleboardbord; Trekk til shuffleboard; Shuffleboardpudder; Shuffleboardpucker
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Επιτραπέζιο shuffleboard: Τραπέζια shuffleboard; Καλύμματα για τραπέζια shuffleboard; Πούδρα επιτραπέζιου shuffleboard; Δίσκοι επιτραπέζιου shuffleboard
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Stolni Shuffleboard: Stolovi za shuffleboard; Navlake za stolni shuffleboard; Prah za shuffleboard; Pakovi za stolni shuffleboard
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Shuffleboard de mesa: Mesas de shuffleboard; Coberturas para mesas de shuffleboard; Pó para shuffleboard de mesa; Discos para shuffleboard de mesa
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Bordsshuffleboard: Shuffleboardbord; Överdrag till shuffleboard; Pulver till bordsshuffleboard; Puckar till bordsshuffleboard
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Trò chơi đẩy đĩa: Bàn đẩy đĩa; Bạt phủ bàn shuffleboard; Bột cho môn đẩy đĩa trên bàn; Đĩa chơi trong trò khẩy đĩa trên bàn
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Table Shuffleboard: Shuffleboard Tables; Table Shuffleboard Covers; Table Shuffleboard Powder; Table Shuffleboard Pucks
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > テーブルシャッフルボード: シャッフルボード台; テーブルシャッフルボードカバー; テーブルシャッフルボード用パウダー; テーブルシャッフルボード用パック